Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 350 Surface Coal Mining

350.005.
Strip Mining and Reclamation Commission abolished; transfer of functions. [Repealed.]

350.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Surface coal mining operations” means activities conducted on the surface of lands in connection with a surface coal mine and surface impacts incident to an underground coal mine. The activities shall include excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal, including such common methods as contour, strip, auger, extended depth secondary recovery systems, mountaintop removal, box cut, open pit, and area mining, the use of explosives and blasting, and in situ distillation or retorting, leaching, or other chemical or physical processing, and cleaning, concentrating, or other processing or preparation, and the loading of coal at or near the mine site. Excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal includes extraction of coal from refuse piles. The activities shall not include the extraction of coal by a landowner of fifty (50) tons or less within twelve (12) successive calendar months for his own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by him; the extraction of twenty-five (25) to two hundred fifty (250) tons of coal as an incidental part of privately financed construction where the coal is donated to a charitable or educational organization for noncommercial use or noncommercial distribution; the extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state, or local government financed highway or other construction under administrative regulations established by the cabinet; the extraction of, or intent to extract, twenty-five (25) tons or less of coal by any person by surface coal mining operations within twelve (12) successive calendar months; the extraction of coal incidental to the extraction of other minerals where coal does not exceed sixteen and two-thirds percent (16-2/3%) of the tonnage of minerals removed for purposes of commercial use or sale; or coal exploration subject to KRS

350.057

. Surface coal mining operations shall also include the areas upon which the activities occur or where the activities disturb the natural land surface. The areas shall also include any adjacent land, the use of which is incidental to the activities, all lands affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of the activities and for haulage, and excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface resulting from or incident to the activities. This definition shall include the terms “strip mining” of coal and the “surface effects of underground mining” of coal as used in this chapter;

“Strip mining” means the breaking of the surface soil in order to facilitate or accomplish the extraction or removal of minerals, ores, or other solid matter; any activity or process constituting all or part of a process for the extraction or removal of minerals, ores, and other solid matter from its original location; and the preparation, washing, cleaning, or other treatment of minerals, ores, or other solid matter so as to make them suitable for commercial, industrial, or construction use; but shall not include the extraction of coal by a landowner for his own noncommercial use of fifty (50) tons or less within twelve (12) successive calendar months from land owned or leased by him; the extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state, or local government financed highway or other construction under administrative regulations established by the cabinet; the extraction of, or intent to extract, twenty-five (25) tons or less of coal by any person by surface coal mining operations within twelve (12) successive calendar months; the extraction of coal incidental to the extraction of other minerals where coal does not exceed sixteen and two-thirds percent (16-2/3%) of the tonnage of minerals removed for purposes of commercial use or sale; coal exploration subject to KRS

350.057

; nor shall it include the surface effects or surface impacts of underground coal mining;

“Surface coal mining and reclamation operations” means surface coal mining operations and all activities necessary and incident to the reclamation of the operations as required by this chapter;

“Overburden” means material of any nature, consolidated or unconsolidated, excluding topsoil, which lies above a natural deposit of coal and also means the material after removal from its natural state in the process of surface coal mining;

“Area of land affected” means any area of land or water upon which surface coal mining and reclamation operations are conducted or located or are to be conducted or located;

“Operations” means surface coal mining operations, all of the premises, facilities, roads, and equipment used in the process of producing coal from a designated area or removing overburden for the purpose of determining the location, quality, or quantity of a natural coal deposit or the activity to facilitate or accomplish the extraction or the removal of coal;

“Method of operation” means the method or manner by which the cut or open pit is made, the overburden is placed or handled, water is controlled, and other acts are performed by the operator in the process of uncovering and removing the coal;

“Operator” means any person, partnership, or corporation engaged in surface coal mining operations who removes or intends to remove more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal from the earth by coal mining within twelve (12) consecutive calendar months in any one (1) location;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, society, joint stock company, firm, company, or other business organization and shall also include any agency, unit, or instrumentality of federal, state, or local government including any publicly-owned utility or publicly-owned corporation of federal, state, or local government;

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Reclamation” means the reconditioning of the area affected by surface coal mining operations under a plan approved by the cabinet;

“Degree” when used in this chapter shall mean from the horizontal, and in each case shall be subject to a tolerance of five percent (5%) of error;

“Bench” means the ledge, shelf, or terrace formed in the contour method of strip mining;

“Approximate original contour” means that surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading of the mined area so that the reclaimed area, including any terracing or access roads, closely resembles the general surface configuration of the land prior to mining and blends into and complements the drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain, with all highwalls and spoil piles eliminated; water impoundments may be permitted where the cabinet determines that they are in compliance with KRS

350.455

;

“Certification” by a qualified registered professional engineer, as required by this chapter and administrative regulations promulgated hereunder, means a good faith representation to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, based on adequate knowledge of the requirements of this chapter and administrative regulations promulgated hereunder, related experience, best professional judgment, accepted engineering practices and recognized professional standards, and standard practice as it relates to direct participation by the registered professional engineer or supervision of the registered professional engineer’s employees or subordinates. Certification shall not be construed to constitute a warranty or guarantee;

“Reclamation development fund” means only that reconditioning of land affected by surface mining, which will directly promote and benefit the fund administered by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority to foster economic development on surface mining land;

“Reclamation development project” means only that reconditioning of land affected by surface mining, which will directly promote and benefit an economic undertaking which constitutes a project under KRS

154.1-010

(20);

“Reclamation development plan” means a plan submitted to the cabinet to show compliance with reclamation standards, and submitted to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority to seek moneys from the reclamation development fund for a reclamation development project;

“Permit applicant” or “applicant” means a person applying for a permit;

“Permittee” means a person holding a permit to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations;

“Unanticipated event or condition” as used in KRS 350.085(7) means an event or condition encountered in a remining operation that was not contemplated by the applicable surface coal mining and reclamation permit;

“Lands eligible for remining” means those lands that would otherwise be eligible for expenditures under KRS 350.560(1) or (2);

“Coal combustion by-products” means fly ash, bottom ash, scrubber sludge, and waste from fluidized bed combustion, produced by the combustion of coal. Coal combustion by-products do not include boiler slag, or residues of refuse derived fuels, such as municipal solid waste, tires, and solvents;

“NAD 83” means the North American Datum, 1983 version, in feet units; and

“Single Zone Projection” means the Kentucky Single Zone State Plane Coordinate System of 1983, based on the Lambert Conformal map projection with double standard parallels on the North American Datum, as established in 10 KAR 5:010.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 1; 1956, (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 1; 1960, ch. 143, § 3; 1962, ch. 105, § 1; 1964, ch. 61, § 1; 1966, ch. 4, § 1; 1968, ch. 152, § 149; 1972, ch. 270, § 1; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 58; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2), (7); 1978, ch. 330, § 14, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 1, effective March 21, 1980; 1982, ch. 283, § 1, effective April 2, 1982; 1982, ch. 357, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 145, § 5, effective March 28, 1984; 1988, ch. 383, § 18, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 306, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 105, § 59, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 107, § 15, effective July 1, 1992; 1992, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 429, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 178, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 390, § 35, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 459, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 123, § 49, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 79, § 10, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 1873, effective July 15, 2010.

Section 11 of Acts 1982, ch. 283, provided: “The general assembly finds and declares that it is vitally important to the Commonwealth that the statutes relating to surface coal mining be cohesive and administratively workable. Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that an emergency exists and that this legislation shall become validly enacted law when signed by the governor, and the provisions of this Act shall become operative simultaneously with the approval of the state’s proposed permanent program by the secretary of the interior pursuant to Public Law 95-87, the surface mining control and reclamation act of 1977. In the event that the secretary of the interior approves the permanent program before this legislation is signed by the governor, then the provisions of this Act shall become effective immediately upon the signing of this Act by the governor.”

This section is set out above to reflect a correction to the section reference appearing in (18) from KRS

154.01-010

(20) to

154.1-010

(20) due to renumbering by the state reviser effective in 2013.

350.020.
Declaration of legislative policy and finding of fact.

The General Assembly finds that the Commonwealth is the leading producer of coal and that the production of coal in Kentucky contributes significantly to the nation’s energy needs. The General Assembly further finds that unregulated surface coal mining operations cause soil erosion, damage from rolling stones and overburden, landslides, stream pollution, the accumulation of stagnant water and the seepage of contaminated water, increase the likelihood of floods, destroy the value of land for agricultural purposes, destroy aesthetic values, counteract efforts for the conservation of soil, water and other natural resources, destroy or impair the property rights of citizens, create fire hazards, and in general create hazards dangerous to life and property, so as to constitute an imminent and inordinate peril to the welfare of the Commonwealth. The General Assembly further finds that lands that have been subjected to surface coal mining operations and have not been reclaimed and rehabilitated in accordance with modern standards constitute the aforementioned perils to the welfare of the Commonwealth. The General Assembly further finds that there are wide variations in the circumstances and conditions surrounding and arising out of surface coal mining operations due primarily to difference in topographical and geological conditions, and by reason thereof it is necessary, in order to provide the most effective, beneficial and equitable solution to the problem, that a broad discretion be vested in the authority designated to administer and enforce the regulatory provisions enacted by the General Assembly. The General Assembly further finds that governmental responsibility for regulating surface coal mining operations rests with state government and hereby directs the Energy and Environment Cabinet to take all actions necessary to preserve and exercise the Commonwealth’s authority, to the exclusion of all other governmental entities except the Commonwealth and agencies thereof and except as provided in KRS Chapter 100. Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to provide such regulation and control of surface coal mining operations as to minimize or prevent injurious effects on the people and resources of the Commonwealth. To that end, the cabinet is directed to rigidly enforce this chapter and to adopt whatever administrative regulations are found necessary to accomplish the purpose of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 2; 1964, ch. 61, § 2; 1966, ch. 4, § 2; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 59; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 332, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 2; 1988, ch. 253, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 374, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2010, ch. 24, § 1874, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 85, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2015).
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 2 provides that the amendments made to this statute in that Act shall not relate to permit actions or bonds required thereby in the effect prior to the Act's effective date, which was June 24, 2015.

Compiler's Notes.

For effective date of the 1980 amendment to this section, see Compiler’s Notes to KRS

350.010

.

350.024.
Reclamation Commission — Membership — Meetings — Compensation. [Repealed.]

350.025.
Provisions inconsistent with federal law unenforceable.

Any provision of this chapter which is set forth as inconsistent with the provisions of Public Law 95-87 by the Secretary of the Interior pursuant to Section 505(b) of that act shall be deemed superseded by federal law and shall thereafter be unenforceable by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 209, § 5.

350.026.
Transfer of records, property, personnel, funds. [Repealed.]

350.028.
Powers of cabinet.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall have and exercise the following authority and powers:

To adopt administrative regulations after a hearing pertaining to surface coal mining operations including strip mining and the surface effects of underground mining to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

To conduct investigations and hearings under provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

To issue, after an opportunity for a hearing, suspension orders or show cause orders requiring an operator, permittee, or person to adopt remedial measures that are necessary to comply with this chapter and administrative regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Failure to attend a hearing shall be excused for good cause shown;

To issue, after an opportunity for a hearing, a final order imposing civil penalties for violations of this chapter or directing the Department for Natural Resources to revoke a permit, when the requirements set forth by the notice of noncompliance, order of cessation, or an order of the cabinet requiring remedial measures have not been complied with according to the terms therein. When the secretary or his authorized representatives determines that a pattern of violations of any requirements of this chapter or any permit conditions required by this chapter exists or has existed, and if the secretary or his authorized representatives also find that the violations are caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply with any requirements of this chapter or any permit conditions or that the violations are willfully caused by the permittee, the secretary or his authorized representative shall forthwith issue an order to the permittee to show cause as to why the permit should not be suspended or revoked and shall provide an opportunity for a hearing. Failure to attend a hearing shall be excused for good cause shown; and

To adopt administrative regulations to allow the state to administer and enforce the initial and permanent regulatory programs of Public Law 95-87, “Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977.” Administrative regulations shall be no more stringent than required by that law. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as superseding, amending, modifying, or repealing any of the acts listed in Section 702(a) of Public Law 95-87, or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 105, § 2(1) to (3), (5); 1966, ch. 4, § 4; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 60; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2), (7); 1978, ch. 330, § 15, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 3, effective March 21, 1980; 1982, ch. 283, § 2, effective April 2, 1982; 1992, ch. 304, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 429, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 123, § 50, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 1875, effective July 15, 2010.

350.0281.
Moratorium on regulations — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

350.0285.
Notification to Transportation Cabinet of permits for mine openings and of mine closings under authority of cabinet.

The cabinet shall notify the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet every six (6) months of permits issued for mine openings and mine closings under the authority of the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 488, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

350.029.
Regulations to implement Interstate Mining Compact — Adoption — Limitations.

The cabinet is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt, after public hearing, reasonable regulations in order to formulate and establish effective programs for the control of surface soil disturbance in connection with mining as defined by the Interstate Mining Compact. Such regulations shall follow the general standards established in Article III of the Interstate Mining Compact. The cabinet shall have the authority to adopt such regulations prior to the effective date of the Interstate Mining Compact and irrespective of whether the state becomes a member or withdraws from membership in the Interstate Mining Compact. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant the cabinet additional authority in regulating the strip mining of coal or clay, and the authority granted to the cabinet by this section shall be separate from the powers of the cabinet already enacted relating to the strip mining of coal and clay.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 79; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 61.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Bratt and Brown, Environmental Law, 70 Ky. L.J. 455 (1981-82).

350.030.
Strip Mining and Reclamation Commission. [Repealed.]

350.0301.
Petition challenging determination of cabinet — Conduct of hearings — Administrative regulations — Secretary may designate deputy to sign final orders.

Any person who considers himself or herself aggrieved by any determination made by the cabinet under this chapter may file, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet under the provisions of this chapter, a petition alleging that the determination is contrary to law or fact and is injurious to him, the grounds and reasons therefor, and demand a hearing. Unless the cabinet considers that the petition is frivolous, it shall serve written notice of the petition on each person named therein and shall schedule a hearing before the cabinet not less than twenty-one (21) days after the date of the notice unless the person complained against waives in writing the twenty-one (21) day period. The right to demand a hearing pursuant to this section shall be limited to a period of thirty (30) days after the petitioner has had actual notice of the determination complained of, or could reasonably have had notice. However, the petitioner shall have the opportunity to contest the validity of an underlying notice of noncompliance in a timely-filed demand for hearing to contest the validity of a cessation order issued for a failure to abate the violation contained in the notice of noncompliance.

All hearings, other than conferences, under this chapter shall be held before a hearing officer, duly qualified to practice law in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, who may be a full-time employee of the cabinet, serve by contract, or be paid on a per diem basis in the discretion of the cabinet. After the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall within thirty (30) days make to the secretary a report and recommended order which shall contain a finding of fact and a conclusion of law. If the secretary finds upon written request of the hearing officer that additional time is needed, the secretary may grant an extension. The hearing officer shall serve a copy of his report and recommended order upon all parties of record and their attorney of record to the proceeding, and they shall be granted the right to file exceptions thereto within fourteen (14) days of service. Any party may submit a written response to exceptions within twenty-one (21) days of service of the report and recommended order. Exceptions and responses not timely filed shall be noted and made a part of the record but shall not be considered by the secretary in making a final order. The secretary shall consider the report, exceptions, and recommended order and decide the case. The decision shall be served by mail upon all parties and their attorney of record and shall be a final order of the cabinet.

Any party to a hearing under this subsection may be represented by counsel, may make oral or written argument, offer testimony, cross-examine witnesses, or take any combination of these actions. The record of the hearing shall be open to public inspection, and copies thereof shall be made available to any person upon payment of the actual cost of reproducing the original.

All hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be open to the public.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to the provisions set forth in this chapter, establishing formal and informal hearing procedures by which any hearing shall, upon the written request of the operator, permittee, or person, be held in the county or regional office where the surface coal mining operation is located, before an impartial hearing officer who is independent of any prosecutorial functions of the cabinet. The administrative regulations shall provide for the conduct of hearings and investigation of any matter relating to the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations and provide for the assessment and payment of civil penalties. The procedures developed pursuant to this subsection shall provide that the hearings be held in the most expeditious manner possible within the time constraints established under this chapter. No person who presided at a prior hearing shall either preside at a subsequent hearing or participate in any further decision or subsequent administrative appeal in the same matter.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to the provisions set forth in this chapter establishing procedures for the holding of administrative conferences needed to implement the provisions of this chapter.

The secretary may designate a deputy to sign any or all final orders of the cabinet, whether the orders are the result of hearing or agreement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 304, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 178, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 123, § 51, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 85, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

350.0305.
Appeal of cabinet’s order.

Any party aggrieved by a final order resulting from the hearing conducted pursuant to KRS 350.0301(1) on cabinet determinations may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court; except that judicial review of a final order resulting from a hearing on the issuance of a notice of noncompliance, the issuance of an order for cessation and immediate compliance, the assessment of civil penalties, or a bond forfeiture shall be in accordance with KRS

350.032

. The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) days from the rendition of the final order. The party or parties affected by the final order shall file in the Circuit Court a petition which states fully the grounds upon which a review is sought and shall assign all errors relied on. The cabinet shall be named respondent, and service shall be had on the cabinet. Summons shall issue upon the petition directing the cabinet to send its entire record, properly bound, to the clerk of the Circuit Court after certifying that the record is its entire original record or a true copy. The record, when filed, shall become official and be considered by the Circuit Court on the review. After the case has been properly docketed in the Circuit Court, any party directly affected by the issues on appeal, may, upon notice to the parties, upon proper showing, and in the discretion of the court, be permitted to intervene. The court shall review the entire record and the findings and final order of the cabinet. No objection to the final order shall be considered by the court unless it was raised before the cabinet or there were reasonable grounds for failure to do so. The findings of the cabinet as to the facts, if supported by substantial evidence, shall be conclusive. The commencement of the proceedings under this section shall not operate as a stay of the cabinet’s final order unless specifically ordered by the court. Appeals to the Court of Appeals from orders of the Circuit Court shall be taken in the manner provided in the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 304, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 178, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

350.032.
Enforcement of subpoenas — Judicial review of final orders — Forfeiture of performance bond — Temporary relief pending final determination.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any Circuit Court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by any party, may issue to that person an order requiring him to appear before the cabinet, there to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question; and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the cabinet resulting from a hearing on the issuance of a notice of noncompliance, the issuance of an order for cessation and immediate compliance, the assessment of civil penalties, or a bond forfeiture may obtain a review of the order by filing in the Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county within which the mine is located, within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order, a written petition praying that the order be modified or set aside in whole or in part, provided that a surety on a performance bond shall not file such petition until it has complied with subsection (3) of this section. A copy of the petition shall be forthwith served upon the cabinet, and thereupon the cabinet shall certify and file in court a copy of the record before the cabinet, including therein all pleadings, orders, documentary exhibits and the stenographic transcript of the testimony taken before the cabinet. When these have been filed, the court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to affirm, modify, enforce or set aside the order, in whole or in part. No objection to the order may be considered by the court unless it was urged before the cabinet or there were reasonable grounds for failure to do so. The findings of the cabinet as to the facts, if supported by substantial evidence, are conclusive. If either party applies to the court for leave to adduce additional evidence, and shows to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for failure to adduce the evidence in the hearings before the cabinet, the court may order that additional evidence be taken before the cabinet in such manner and upon such condition as the court may consider proper. The cabinet may modify its findings as to the facts, by reason of the additional evidence so taken; and it shall file any modified or new findings with the court, which if supported by substantial evidence shall be conclusive, and any recommendation for the modification or setting aside of the original order. The commencement of the proceedings under this section does not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the cabinet’s order. An appeal may be taken from the judgment of the Circuit Court to the Court of Appeals on the same terms and conditions as an appeal is taken in any civil action.

Where the cabinet has ordered forfeiture of a performance bond, the surety shall forward to the cabinet by certified mail a cashier’s check for the required amount within seven (7) business days from the effective date of the order. The cabinet shall establish an interest-bearing escrow account and shall deposit therein the full amount of the forfeiture rendered by the surety. The amount shall continue to be held by the cabinet until completion of judicial review as authorized in subsection (2) of this section. If the final decision following the review reverses the order of the secretary of the cabinet, the cabinet shall within thirty (30) days of receipt of such order, refund to the surety the appropriate amount plus all interest accrued from the date of deposit to the date of the final order.

In the case of a proceeding to review any order or decision issued by the secretary under this chapter pertaining to surface coal mining operations, the court may, under such conditions as it may prescribe, grant such temporary relief as it deems appropriate pending final determination of the proceedings if:

All parties to the proceedings have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

The person requesting the relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that he will prevail on the merits of the final determination of the proceeding; and

The relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 105, § 2(4), (6); 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 62; 1982, ch. 192, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 145, § 1, effective March 28, 1984; 1984, ch. 257, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 331, § 47, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 400, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 178, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

350.035.
Department for Natural Resources — Divisions — Appointment of special investigations officers. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 3; 1966, ch. 4, § 5; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 63; 1978, ch. 332, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 377, § 2, effective May 18, 1982; 1982, ch. 150, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 123, § 52, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 3; 1966, ch. 4, § 5; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 63; 1978, ch. 332, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 377, § 2, effective May 18, 1982; 1982, ch. 150, § 2, effective July 15, 1982;
2005, ch. 123, § 52, effective June 20, 2005) was repealed by Acts
2017, ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

350.040.
Director of Strip Mining and Reclamation; employment of personnel; utilization of other state services and facilities. [Repealed.]

350.045.
Transfer of records, property, personnel and funds to Department of Conservation. [Repealed.]

350.050.
Powers of cabinet.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet under the supervision of the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall have and exercise the following authority and powers:

To exercise general supervision and administration and enforcement of this chapter and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated thereunder;

To encourage and conduct investigations, research, experiments, and demonstrations, and to collect and disseminate information relating to strip mining and reclamation of lands and waters affected by strip mining;

To adopt, without hearing, internal procedures with respect to the filing of reports, the issuance of permits, and other matters of procedure and administration;

To examine and pass upon all plans and specifications submitted by the permit applicant for the method of operation, backfilling, grading, and for the reclamation of the area of land affected by his operation;

To make investigations or inspections which may be deemed necessary to insure compliance with any provision of this chapter;

To order, through personnel of the cabinet, the suspension of any permit for failure to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

To order, through personnel of the cabinet, the stopping of any operation that is started without first having secured a permit as required by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 5; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 5; 1962, ch. 105, § 3; 1966, ch. 4, § 6; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 64; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2), (7); 1978, ch. 332, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 429, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 1876, effective July 15, 2010.

350.052.
Powers, qualifications, and training of special investigations officers. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 150, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 64, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 416, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 303, effective June 26, 2007§ 49; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 150, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 64, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; ch. 416, effective July 14, 2000;
2007, ch. 85, § 303, effective June 26, 2007) was
repealed by ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

350.053.
Seizure and sale of equipment — Rights of owner or lien holder. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 150, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 205, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 150, § 6, effective July 15, 1982;
1990, ch. 205, § 2, effective July 13, 1990;
1990, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 13, 1990) was repealed by
ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

350.054.
Illegal mining and conveyance reclamation fund — Purpose — Control.

There is established a special fund to be known as the “Illegal Mining and Conveyance Reclamation Fund” which shall be under the control of the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

The fund shall consist of all moneys from the sale or forfeiture of all instrumentalities used in violation of KRS 350.057(3) or 350.060(1).

Moneys in the fund may be used for the following purposes:

To reclaim lands mined without a permit or authorization, as required by KRS

350.057

or 350.060(1), and not eligible for the abandoned mine lands reclamation fund; and

To defray all expenses associated with the seizure, storing, and sale of forfeited property.

Moneys contained in the illegal mining and conveyance reclamation fund shall be deemed a trust and agency account and shall not lapse.

The cabinet shall have access to and control of the moneys held in the illegal mining and conveyance reclamation fund, but shall expend the moneys only for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 150, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 212, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 24, § 1877, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 48, effective June 29, 2017.